Hawaii statutes.
§334-60.2 Involuntary hospitalization
criteria. A person may be committed to a psychiatric facility for
involuntary hospitalization, if the court finds:

(1) That the person is mentally ill or suffering from
substance abuse;

(2) That the person is imminently dangerous to self
or others; and

(3) That the person is in need of care or treatment,
or both, and there is no suitable alternative available through existing
facilities and programs which would be less restrictive than hospitalization.
[L 1984, c 188, pt of §3; am L 1985, c 75, §2; am L 1986, c 335, §4; am L 2013,
c 221, §§5, 24; am L 2016, c 114, §6]

Cross References

Intermediate sanctions for selected offenders and defendants,
see §§353-10.5, 353-63.5, and 706-605.1.

Law Journals and Reviews

Risky Business: Assessing Dangerousness in Hawai‘i. 24 UH
L. Rev. 63.

Case Notes

In light of the definition of "dangerous to self"
under §334-1, person's refusal to take medications and person's racist remarks
to strangers constituted insufficient evidence to support family court's
finding that person was imminently and substantially dangerous to person's
self. 102 H. 528 (App.), 78 P.3d 341.

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next